Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2301
Parking meters; acquisition, erection, maintenance, operation; ordinance.

The governing body of any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village may enact ordinances providing for the acquisition, establishment, erection, maintenance, and operation of a system of parking meters or other similar mechanical devices requiring a reasonable deposit from those who park vehicles for stipulated periods of time in certain areas of such a city or village in which the congestion of vehicular traffic is such that the public convenience and safety require such regulation.

Laws 1955, c. 61, § 1, p. 193.

First-class city could regulate parking on city street. Vap v. City of McCook, 178 Neb. 844, 136 N.W.2d 220 (1965).